Mississippi, session 2026, HB1831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Humphreys County, Mississippi, in its discretion, is authorized to contribute an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) during calendar year 2026, out of any available funds of the county general fund, to the Fannie Lou Hamer Cancer Foundation, a 501(c)(3) corporation, which provides education regarding the prevention and protection from cancer. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.